Utah statutes.
7-9-17.   Membership officer -- Appointment -- Eligibility -- Function -- Appeals from.

(1) One or more membership officers may be appointed by the board of directors.

(2)  A membership officer may approve applications for membership under conditions prescribed by the board of directors and the bylaws.

(3)  A membership officer shall be appointed from among the members of the credit union.

(4)  A president, vice president, or loan officer may not serve as a membership officer.

(5)  The membership officer authorized to approve membership shall submit to the board of directors at each monthly meeting a list of approved or pending applications for membership received since the previous monthly meeting, and other related information as the board or the bylaws may require.

(6)  A person denied membership by a membership officer may appeal the denial to the board of directors.

